Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.100

Advertising.

The term "licensed home inspector" and the license number of the inspector must appear on all advertising, correspondence, and documents incidental to a home inspection. However, businesses and organizations that conduct national or interstate general marketing and advertising campaigns may omit the license number of the inspector in advertising so long as it is included on all documents incident to a home inspection.

[ 2008 c 119 s 10.]